Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 14. Funds Transfers.

Revisor’s notes. —

This chapter is based on Article 4A of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Cross references. —

For nonapplicability of this chapter to transactions that began or causes of action that accrued before January 1, 1994, see § 14, ch. 34, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts.